src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! Prefixes

!LEXICON person_prefixes
!@U.pn.sg1@:@U.pn.sg1@ny     nv_lex ;
!@U.pn.sg2@:@U.pn.sg2@py     nv_lex ;
!@U.pn.sg3m@:@U.pn.sg3m@y  nv_lex ;
!@U.pn.sg3f@:@U.pn.sg3f@õ     nv_lex ;
!@U.pn.pl1@:@U.pn.pl1@ã     nv_lex ;
!@U.pn.pl2@:@U.pn.pl2@hĩ     nv_lex ;
!@U.pn.pl3@:@U.pn.pl3@ỹ     nv_lex ;


!LEXICON nv_lex
!Nouns ;
!Verbs ;


!! Suffixes
! Facundes (2000:322, table 3)
!
!  1	   2	      3	    4		5	6	7	8	9	10	11	12	13
!  Distr   Caus	      Intr  Augm	T.Caus	Fact	ColTV	Prog	Almost	Random	Intens	Desid	RS
!  -puku   -ka2	      -rewa -puwa	-kũtaka	-ã2	-pirĩka	-nany	-wari	-ãpu	-ka1	-ene	-pira
!tv +	   +	      #	    
!iv #	   +	      +
! Facundes (2000:330, table 4)
!Table 4: Suffixes of Class2 and their Position Classes
!   14	  15	   16	     17	       18	19
!   Vblz  Hypoth   Recipr    Immin     Caus	Hab
!   -ta	  -ã3	   -kaka     -napanu   -ka3	-pi
!tv +	  +	   -	     +	       +	+
!iv +	  +	   +	     +	       +	+


LEXICON v_suf
+V: v_person ;

LEXICON v_person
@U.pn.sg1@+Sg1:@U.pn.sg1@        # ;
@U.pn.sg2@+Sg2:@U.pn.sg2@        # ;
@U.pn.sg3m@+Sg3+Msc:@U.pn.sg3m@  # ;
@U.pn.sg3f@+Sg3+Fem:@U.pn.sg3f@  # ;
@U.pn.pl1@+Pl1:@U.pn.pl1@        # ;
@U.pn.pl2@+Pl2:@U.pn.pl2@        # ;
@U.pn.pl3@+Pl3:@U.pn.pl3@na      # ;


LEXICON V_SUFFIXES_01_vido
+Vido: V_SUFFIXES_01 ;

LEXICON V_SUFFIXES_01_vids
+Vids: V_SUFFIXES_01 ;
LEXICON V_SUFFIXES_01_TV
+TV: V_SUFFIXES_01 ;
LEXICON V_SUFFIXES_01_IV
+IV: V_SUFFIXES_01 ;

LEXICON V_SUFFIXES_01
!n-arika-ru ScSg1+Oc3F
!karuwa-ta-no non-indian+VBLZ+OcSg1
!0-upũ-pe
  YES/NO_DISTR ;
+Der+Der/NomAct+N:%^VowRM%>inhi N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc ;!Direct from verb stem 
+Der+Der/NIku+N:%^VowRM%>iku N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_UND/0 ;!Direct from verb stem 
!+Der+Der/NomAct+N:%^VowRM%>inhi Cases ;!Direct from verb stem to cases 2021-03-02
!sa%^VowRM%>inhi
+Impf+Pred:%>panhi%>ka  V_SUFFIXES_02 ;!2021-03-02 work around for personal endings.

!! aiata+Impf+Pred:**caça/hunting**
!! aiatapanhika
! V_SUFFIXES_02 ; !This may allow all
+Der+Der/NomAct+N:%^VowRM%>inhi N_SUFFIXES_02 ;
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:%>myna N_SUFFIXES_02 ;
@D.PN@+Relzr-Subj+Msc:@D.PN@%>ta%>kary # ; ! should this relativizer have %>ta here ?
@D.PN@+Relzr-Subj+Fem:@D.PN@%>ta%>karu # ;
@D.PN@+Relzr-Obj+Msc:@D.PN@%>ta%>kyty # ;
@D.PN@+Relzr-Obj+Fem:@D.PN@%>ta%>kytu # ; ! 
+Perf:%>pe # ;
+Perf+Pred:%>pe%>ka V_SUFFIXES_02 ;
+Perf+Pss:%>pe%^VowNasL%>ka V_SUFFIXES_02 ;
+Temp:%>saaky V_SUFFIXES_02 ;
+Temp:%>sawaky V_SUFFIXES_02 ;
!apuka+V+Temp+ScSg1+Oc3M
!n-apuka-saaky-ry

LEXICON V_SUFFIXES_02 !CHECKORDERING (Facundes 2000: 409)
!@R.PN.SG1@+ScSg1:@R.PN.SG1@ V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
!@R.PN.PL1@+ScPl1:@R.PN.PL1@ V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
!@R.PN.SG2@+ScSg2:@R.PN.SG2@ V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
!@R.PN.PL2@+ScPl2:@R.PN.PL2@ V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
!@R.PN.SG3M@+ScSg3M:@R.PN.SG3M@ V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
!@R.PN.SG3F@+ScSg3F:@R.PN.SG3F@ V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
!@R.PN.PL3M@+ScPl3M:@R.PN.PL3M@%>na V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
!@R.PN.PL3F@+ScPl3F:@R.PN.PL3F@%>na V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
!@D.PN@ V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
V_SUFFIXES_03 ;

LEXICON V_SUFFIXES_03
+Dat:%>munhi    V_SUFFIXES_04   ;!to para
+Com:%>kata    V_SUFFIXES_04   ;!with, +Com in kpv Associative marker
+All:%>mukary    V_SUFFIXES_04   ;!to para
+Loc:%>ã   V_SUFFIXES_04  ;! both +Loc and +Ins
+Frustr:%>ma V_SUFFIXES_04  ;!
+Emph+Frustr:%>pyty%>ma V_SUFFIXES_04  ;!
 V_SUFFIXES_04 ;

LEXICON V_SUFFIXES_04
@D.OCPN@+Refl:@D.OCPN@%>wa V_SUFFIXES_05 ;
@P.OCPN.SG1@:@P.OCPN.SG1@%>nu V_SUFFIXES_05 ;
@P.OCPN.PL1@:@P.OCPN.PL1@%>wa V_SUFFIXES_05 ;
@P.OCPN.SG2@:@P.OCPN.SG2@%>i V_SUFFIXES_05 ;
@P.OCPN.PL2@:@P.OCPN.PL2@%>i V_SUFFIXES_05 ;
@P.OCPN.3M@:@P.OCPN.3M@%>ry V_SUFFIXES_05 ; ! Singular and Plural
@P.OCPN.3M@+Err/Orth-i-not-y:@P.OCPN.3M@%>ri V_SUFFIXES_05 ; ! Singular and Plural
@P.OCPN.3F@:@P.OCPN.3F@%>ru V_SUFFIXES_05 ;

 V_SUFFIXES_05 ;

LEXICON V_SUFFIXES_05
@R.PN.SG1@+ScSg1:@R.PN.SG1@ V_SUFFIXES_06 ;
@R.PN.PL1@@D.EO.PhonNasal@+ScPl1:@R.PN.PL1@@D.EO.PhonNasal@ V_SUFFIXES_06 ;
@R.PN.PL1@@R.EO.PhonNasal@+ScPl1+Err/Orth-phon-nasal:@R.PN.PL1@@R.EO.PhonNasal@ V_SUFFIXES_06 ;
@R.PN.SG2@+ScSg2:@R.PN.SG2@ V_SUFFIXES_06 ;
@R.PN.PL2@+ScPl2:@R.PN.PL2@ V_SUFFIXES_06 ;
@R.PN.SG3M@+ScSg3M:@R.PN.SG3M@ V_SUFFIXES_06 ;
@R.PN.SG3F@@D.EO.PhonNasal@+ScSg3F:@R.PN.SG3F@@D.EO.PhonNasal@ V_SUFFIXES_06 ;
@R.PN.SG3F@@R.EO.PhonNasal@+ScSg3F+Err/Orth-phon-nasal:@R.PN.SG3F@@R.EO.PhonNasal@ V_SUFFIXES_06 ;
@R.PN.PL3M@+ScPl3M:@R.PN.PL3M@%>na V_SUFFIXES_06 ;
@R.PN.PL3M@+ScPl3M:@R.PN.PL3M@%>ne V_SUFFIXES_06 ;!?variation
@R.PN.PL3F@@D.EO.PhonNasal@+ScPl3F:@R.PN.PL3F@@D.EO.PhonNasal@%>na V_SUFFIXES_06 ;
@R.PN.PL3F@@R.EO.PhonNasal@+ScPl3F+Err/Orth-phon-nasal:@R.PN.PL3F@@R.EO.PhonNasal@%>na V_SUFFIXES_06 ;
@D.PN@ V_SUFFIXES_06 ;

LEXICON V_SUFFIXES_06
@R.OCPN.SG1@+OcSg1:@R.OCPN.SG1@ Verbs_END ;
@R.OCPN.PL1@+OcPl1:@R.OCPN.PL1@ Verbs_END ;
@R.OCPN.SG2@+OcSg2:@R.OCPN.SG2@ Verbs_END ;
@R.OCPN.PL2@+OcPl2:@R.OCPN.PL2@ Verbs_END ;
@R.OCPN.3M@+Oc3M:@R.OCPN.3M@ Verbs_END ; ! Singular and Plural
@R.OCPN.3M@+Oc3M:@R.OCPN.3M@ Verbs_END ; ! Singular and Plural
@R.OCPN.3F@+Oc3F:@R.OCPN.3F@ Verbs_END ;
 Verbs_END ;

LEXICON Verbs_END
+Fut:%>ku # ;
# ;


LEXICON YES/NO_DISTR
!1 Distr -puku
@P.VerbDerv.YES@+Distr:@P.VerbDerv.YES@%>puku YES/NO_CAUS-1 ;
 YES/NO_CAUS-1 ;
@P.VerbDerv.YES@+Distr:@P.VerbDerv.YES@%>puku V_SUFFIXES_02 ; !CHECKME 2023-09-25

LEXICON YES/NO_CAUS-1
!2 Caus -ka2
@P.VerbDerv.YES@+Caus:@P.VerbDerv.YES@%>ka YES/NO_INTR ;
 YES/NO_INTR ;

LEXICON YES/NO_INTR
!3 Intr -rewa
@P.VerbDerv.YES@+Intr:@P.VerbDerv.YES@%>rewa YES/NO_AUGM ;
 YES/NO_AUGM ;

LEXICON YES/NO_AUGM
!4 Augm -puwa
@P.VerbDerv.YES@+Augm:@P.VerbDerv.YES@%>puwa YES/NO_TCAUS ;
 YES/NO_TCAUS ;

LEXICON YES/NO_TCAUS
!5	T.Caus -kũtaka
@P.VerbDerv.YES@+TCaus:@P.VerbDerv.YES@%>kũtka YES/NO_FACT ;
 YES/NO_FACT ;

LEXICON YES/NO_FACT
!6 Fact -ã2
@P.VerbDerv.YES@+Fact:@P.VerbDerv.YES@%^VowNasL%>ã YES/NO_COLTV ;
 YES/NO_COLTV ;

LEXICON YES/NO_COLTV
!7 ColTV -pirĩka
@P.VerbDerv.YES@+ColTV:@P.VerbDerv.YES@%>pirĩka YES/NO_PROG ;
	YES/NO_PROG ;

LEXICON	YES/NO_PROG
!8 Prog -nany
@P.VerbDerv.YES@+Prog:@P.VerbDerv.YES@%>nany YES/NO_ALMOST ;
 YES/NO_ALMOST ;
LEXICON YES/NO_ALMOST
!9 Almost -wari
@P.VerbDerv.YES@+Almost:@P.VerbDerv.YES@%>wari YES/NO_RANDOM ;
 YES/NO_RANDOM ;

LEXICON YES/NO_RANDOM
!10 Random -ãpu
@P.VerbDerv.YES@+Random:@P.VerbDerv.YES@%^VowNasL%>ãpu YES/NO_INTENS ;
 YES/NO_INTENS ;

LEXICON YES/NO_INTENS
!11 Intens -ka1
@P.VerbDerv.YES@+Intens:@P.VerbDerv.YES@%>ka YES/NO_DESID ;
 YES/NO_DESID ;

LEXICON YES/NO_DESID
!12 Desid -ene
@P.VerbDerv.YES@+Des:@P.VerbDerv.YES@%>ene YES/NO_RS ;
 YES/NO_RS ;

LEXICON YES/NO_RS
!13 RS -pira
@P.VerbDerv.YES@+RS:@P.VerbDerv.YES@%>pira VRBLZ ;
 VRBLZ ;

LEXICON  VRBLZ
!14 Vblz -ta see also 325 absent
!problem: will not accept form mithapuwary, but will accept mithapuwatary
! Ãamyna mithapuwary pamunukune. 'Uma árvore grande dá medo.'
+Vblz:%>ta YES/NO_HYPOTH ;
@D.VerbDerv@ YES/NO_HYPOTH ;
+Vblz+Der+Der/NomAct+N:%>ta%^VowRM%>inhi N_SUFFIXES_02 ;
+Vblz+Impf+Pred:%>ta%>panhi%>ka  V_SUFFIXES_02 ;
!ukatsaã-ta-panhi-ka

LEXICON YES/NO_HYPOTH
!15 Hypoth -ã3
+Hypoth:%^VowNasL%>ã YES/NO_RECIPR ;
 YES/NO_RECIPR ;

LEXICON YES/NO_RECIPR
!16 Recipr -kaka
+Recipr:%>kaka YES/NO_IMMIN ;
 YES/NO_IMMIN ;

LEXICON YES/NO_IMMIN
!17 Immin -napanu
+Immin:%>napanu YES/NO_CAUS-2 ;
	YES/NO_CAUS-2 ;

LEXICON	YES/NO_CAUS-2
!18 Caus -ka3
+Caus:%>ka YES/NO_HAB ;
 YES/NO_HAB ;

LEXICON YES/NO_HAB
!19 Hab -pi
+Hab:%>pi  YES/NO_PRED-KA ;
 YES/NO_PRED-KA ;
!2020-05-10
+Emph:%>pyty YES/NO_PRED-KA ;

LEXICON YES/NO_PRED-KA
+Pred:%>ka YES/NO_FRUSTR ;
 YES/NO_FRUSTR ;
+Pred+Der+Der/NomAct+N:%>ka%^VowRM%>inhi N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc ; !Direct from verb stem PX required

LEXICON	YES/NO_FRUSTR
+Frustr:%>ma YES/NO_FOC ;
 YES/NO_FOC ;

LEXICON YES/NO_FOC
+Foc:%>ra V_SUFFIXES_02 ;
 V_SUFFIXES_02 ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
