src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
ãta+V:ãta V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV drink" ;
taka+V:taka    V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV put" ;
anuãta+V+IV:anuãta V_SUFFIXES_01 "IV" ;
ẽrẽkũka+V+IV:ẽrẽkũka V_SUFFIXES_01 "IV" ;
isykana+V+IV:isykana V_SUFFIXES_01 "IV" ;
ixukyta+V+IV:ixukyta V_SUFFIXES_01 "IV" ;
kanhikawa+V+IV:kanhikawa V_SUFFIXES_01 "IV" ;
mẽẽamuny͂ka+V+IV:mẽẽamuny͂ka V_SUFFIXES_01 "IV" ;
nỹãpatapỹta+V+IV:nỹãpatapỹta V_SUFFIXES_01 "IV" ;
pusutakata+V+IV:pusutakata V_SUFFIXES_01 "IV" ;
serena+V+IV:serena V_SUFFIXES_01 "IV" ;
tekata+V+IV:tekata V_SUFFIXES_01 "IV" ;
ũpurãkipuwa+V+IV:ũpurãkipuwa V_SUFFIXES_01 "IV" ;
ymukyka+V+IV:ymukyka V_SUFFIXES_01 "IV" ;
ỹpy+V+IV:ỹpy V_SUFFIXES_01 "IV" ;
akiruka+V+TV:akiruka V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
aminhãka+V+TV:aminhãka V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
napa+V+IV:napa V_SUFFIXES_01 "passar" ;
asỹka+V+TV:asỹka V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
awãkyteka+V+TV:awãkyteka V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
etyka+V+TV:etyka V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
iketa+V+TV:iketa V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
imixika+V+TV:imixika V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
iusarika+V+TV:iusarika V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
iuwẽka+V+TV:iuwẽka V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
kanapyrãka+V+TV:kanapyrãka V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
kemita+V+TV:kemita V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
kymatã+V+TV:kymatã V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
maĩka+V+TV:maĩka V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
mynapa+V+TV:mynapa V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
nereka+V+TV:nereka V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
nuwunata+V+TV:nuwunata V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
purykyta+V+TV:purykyta V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
sunaka+V+TV:sunaka V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
txirata+V+TV:txirata V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
ykaxirãkapekataka+V+TV:ykaxirãkapekataka V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV" ;
waika+V+IV:waika V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido be here/estar aqui" ;
aarekary+V+IV:aarekary V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
amiianata+V+IV:amiianata V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
are+V+IV:are V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
aretiã+V+IV:aretiã V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
ateryka+V+IV:ateryka V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
axipitỹare+V+IV:axipitỹare V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
hareka+V+IV:hareka V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
iseta+V+IV:iseta V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
ithanupytyry+V+IV:ithanupytyry V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
ixinera+V+IV:ixinera V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
ĩteka+V+IV:ĩteka V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
kaikure+V+IV:kaikure V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
kakĩpyry+V+IV:kakĩpyry V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
kakuti+V+IV:kakuti V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
kanhupapĩiry+V+IV:kanhupapĩiry V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
kaiãu+v2+V:kaiãa V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "exist a lot" ;
katiku+V+IV:katiku V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
katsupyre+V+IV:katsupyre V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
kipekare+V+IV:kipekare V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
kipekare+V+IV:kipekare V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
kumanãkarery+V+IV:kumanãkarery V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
kunaaryry+V+IV:kunaaryry V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
kỹkakipire+V+IV:kỹkakipire V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
mapyte+V+IV:mapyte V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
mĩiti+V+IV:mĩiti V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
mithepuwa+V+IV:mithepuwa V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
nymukita+V+IV:nymukita V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
pumama+V+IV:pumama V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
pupure+V+IV:pupure V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
pusetãkare+V+IV:pusetãkare V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
puuma+V+IV:puuma V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
puxuku+V+IV:puxuku V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
puxupuru+V+IV:puxupuru V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
pynetapãkawa+V+IV:pynetapãkawa V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
sutukykype+V+IV:sutukykype V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
yenynĩka+V+IV:yenynĩka V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
ytsukyre+V+IV:ytsukyre V_SUFFIXES_01_vido "vido" ;
ixiteta+V+IV:ixiteta V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
mireka+V+IV:mireka V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
natxitha+V+IV:natxitha V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
nyãpata+V+IV:nyãpata V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
puana+V+IV:puana V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
puera+V+IV:puera V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
puxukury+V+IV:puxukury V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
sãpaka+V+IV:sãpaka V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
sãpeta+V+IV:sãpeta V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
seruta+V+IV:seruta V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
sitỹkanãta+V+IV:sitỹkanãta V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
tsatsĩkata+V+IV:tsatsĩkata V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
tyma+V+IV:tyma V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
xãpuka+V+IV:xãpuka V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
ypuãta+V+IV:ypuãta V_SUFFIXES_01_vids "vids" ;
kipa+V:kipa V_SUFFIXES_01 "v" ;
